Florida, session 2026, SB666.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 18 19 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âJudicial 20 Efficiency and Transparency (JET) Act.â 21 Section 2.âSection 28.51, Florida Statutes, is created to 22 read: 23 28.51âPerformance reports of circuit and county court 24 judges.â 25 (1)âEach clerk of the circuit court shall prepare an annual 26 performance report regarding the judicial efficiency of each 27 circuit and county court judge in this state. The report shall 28 detail the judicial activities during the preceding calendar 29 year and contain, but need not be limited to, the following 30 information, all of which shall be separated by court division: 31 (a)âThe number of cases assigned to each judge. 32 (b)âThe number of cases that have reached final 33 disposition. For purposes of this paragraph, the term âfinal 34 dispositionâ means the rendering of a decision or a judgment by 35 a judge in a judicial proceeding in which a case is finally 36 determined by adjudication, dismissal, or other final 37 disposition. 38 (c)âThe clearance rate, stated as the total percentage of 39 cases filed during each reporting period which were disposed of. 40 (d)âThe average length of all active pending cases, 41 measured as the number of days from filing until the end of each 42 reporting period. 43 (e)âThe number of civil cases assigned to each judge, 44 except civil cases placed on inactive status, pending for 3 45 years or more, measured from the filing of a complaint or other 46 filing initiating a case until the end of each reporting period. 47 (f)âThe average number of days, beginning on the date a 48 hearing is scheduled and ending on the date the hearing is held, 49 for each hearing held in each reporting period. 50 (2)âOn or before April 1 of each year, each report shall be 51 posted on the website of the clerk of the circuit court, as 52 applicable, and on the website of each circuit and county court 53 and shall remain posted for the duration of the tenure of the 54 subject judge. 55 (3)âA judge may prepare an explanatory statement detailing 56 the basis for any extenuating circumstance that the judge 57 believes impacts the metrics reported pursuant to this section. 58 Upon approval of the chief judge of each circuit, the 59 explanatory statement shall be posted with the annual 60 performance report pursuant to subsection (2). 61 (4)âThe first reporting period required by this section 62 shall be the 2028 calendar year. 63 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.